Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5134.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 43.117.130 and 2023 c 357 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) With the rise of economic opportunity in America and other parts of the world in the 19th century, the Chinese diaspora is now one of the largest in the world. As a result, many of those who are, or whose ancestors were, part of the Chinese diaspora have varied perspectives, experiences, and approaches in how they preserve their identity as Chinese Americans and Americans of Chinese descent.(2) January of each year will be designated as a time for people of this state to commemorate the contributions of Chinese Americans and Americans of Chinese descent to the history and heritage of Washington state and shall be designated as Chinese American/Americans of Chinese descent history month.(((3) Public schools are encouraged to designate time in January for appropriate activities in commemoration of the lives, history, achievements, and contributions of Chinese Americans and Americans of Chinese descent.))NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 28A.230 RCW to read as follows:(1) Public schools are required to designate time for appropriate activities in commemoration of the lives, history, achievements, and contributions of Chinese Americans and Americans of Chinese descent during January, which is designated as Chinese American/Americans of Chinese descent history month under RCW 43.117.130.(2)(a) Beginning September 1, 2025, when a school district board of directors reviews or adopts its social studies curriculum, it shall incorporate instruction about the Chinese exclusion act and other relevant historical events, such as the Tacoma method.(b)(i) School districts shall meet the requirements of this section by using a curriculum developed and made available free of charge by the Washington state historical society in collaboration with a Washington nonprofit organization that advances civic harmony from differing cultural backgrounds.(ii) School districts may modify the curriculum in (b)(i) of this subsection in order to incorporate elements that have a regionally specific focus or to incorporate the curriculum into existing curricular materials.--- END ---